hyph_tr.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 3
%
% Turkish hyphenation dictionary, 2015.
%
% Algorithm for pattern generation developed by P. A. MacKay for the Ottoman Texts Project in 1987.
% Rules adapted for modern Turkish by H. Turgut Uyar <uyar at itu.edu.tr>. 
% Initiative to improve Turkish patterns by S. Ekin Kocabaş <kocabas at stanford.edu>. 
% Pattern generation script written by Mojca Miklavec <mojca.miklavec.lists at gmail.com> in June 2008. 
% Converted to Hunspell hyphenation patterns by Muratcan Şimşek <mail at muratcansimsek.com.tr> in 2015.
%
2a1
2â1
2e1
2ı1
2i1
2î1
2o1
2ö1
2u1
2ü1
2û1
1b1
1c1
1ç1
1d1
1f1
1g1
1ğ1
1h1
1j1
1k1
1l1
1m1
1n1
1p1
1r1
1s1
1ş1
1t1
1v1
1y1
1z1
2e2cek.
e1c1
ec2e1
ece1k1
2b1b1
2b1c1
2b1ç1
2b1d1
2b1f1
2b1g1
2b1ğ1
2b1h1
2b1j1
2b1k1
2b1l1
2b1m1
2b1n1
2b1p1
2b1r1
2b1s1
2b1ş1
2b1t1
2b1v1
2b1y1
2b1z1
2c1b1
2c1c1
2c1ç1
2c1d1
2c1f1
2c1g1
2c1ğ1
2c1h1
2c1j1
2c1k1
2c1l1
2c1m1
2c1n1
2c1p1
2c1r1
2c1s1
2c1ş1
2c1t1
2c1v1
2c1y1
2c1z1
2ç1b1
2ç1c1
2ç1ç1
2ç1d1
2ç1f1
2ç1g1
2ç1ğ1
2ç1h1
2ç1j1
2ç1k1
2ç1l1
2ç1m1
2ç1n1
2ç1p1
2ç1r1
2ç1s1
2ç1ş1
2ç1t1
2ç1v1
2ç1y1
2ç1z1
2d1b1
2d1c1
2d1ç1
2d1d1
2d1f1
2d1g1
2d1ğ1
2d1h1
2d1j1
2d1k1
2d1l1
2d1m1
2d1n1
2d1p1
2d1r1
2d1s1
2d1ş1
2d1t1
2d1v1
2d1y1
2d1z1
2f1b1
2f1c1
2f1ç1
2f1d1
2f1f1
2f1g1
2f1ğ1
2f1h1
2f1j1
2f1k1
2f1l1
2f1m1
2f1n1
2f1p1
2f1r1
2f1s1
2f1ş1
2f1t1
2f1v1
2f1y1
2f1z1
2g1b1
2g1c1
2g1ç1
2g1d1
2g1f1
2g1g1
2g1ğ1
2g1h1
2g1j1
2g1k1
2g1l1
2g1m1
2g1n1
2g1p1
2g1r1
2g1s1
2g1ş1
2g1t1
2g1v1
2g1y1
2g1z1
2ğ1b1
2ğ1c1
2ğ1ç1
2ğ1d1
2ğ1f1
2ğ1g1
2ğ1ğ1
2ğ1h1
2ğ1j1
2ğ1k1
2ğ1l1
2ğ1m1
2ğ1n1
2ğ1p1
2ğ1r1
2ğ1s1
2ğ1ş1
2ğ1t1
2ğ1v1
2ğ1y1
2ğ1z1
2h1b1
2h1c1
2h1ç1
2h1d1
2h1f1
2h1g1
2h1ğ1
2h1h1
2h1j1
2h1k1
2h1l1
2h1m1
2h1n1
2h1p1
2h1r1
2h1s1
2h1ş1
2h1t1
2h1v1
2h1y1
2h1z1
2j1b1
2j1c1
2j1ç1
2j1d1
2j1f1
2j1g1
2j1ğ1
2j1h1
2j1j1
2j1k1
2j1l1
2j1m1
2j1n1
2j1p1
2j1r1
2j1s1
2j1ş1
2j1t1
2j1v1
2j1y1
2j1z1
2k1b1
2k1c1
2k1ç1
2k1d1
2k1f1
2k1g1
2k1ğ1
2k1h1
2k1j1
2k1k1
2k1l1
2k1m1
2k1n1
2k1p1
2k1r1
2k1s1
2k1ş1
2k1t1
2k1v1
2k1y1
2k1z1
2l1b1
2l1c1
2l1ç1
2l1d1
2l1f1
2l1g1
2l1ğ1
2l1h1
2l1j1
2l1k1
2l1l1
2l1m1
2l1n1
2l1p1
2l1r1
2l1s1
2l1ş1
2l1t1
2l1v1
2l1y1
2l1z1
2m1b1
2m1c1
2m1ç1
2m1d1
2m1f1
2m1g1
2m1ğ1
2m1h1
2m1j1
2m1k1
2m1l1
2m1m1
2m1n1
2m1p1
2m1r1
2m1s1
2m1ş1
2m1t1
2m1v1
2m1y1
2m1z1
2n1b1
2n1c1
2n1ç1
2n1d1
2n1f1
2n1g1
2n1ğ1
2n1h1
2n1j1
2n1k1
2n1l1
2n1m1
2n1n1
2n1p1
2n1r1
2n1s1
2n1ş1
2n1t1
2n1v1
2n1y1
2n1z1
2p1b1
2p1c1
2p1ç1
2p1d1
2p1f1
2p1g1
2p1ğ1
2p1h1
2p1j1
2p1k1
2p1l1
2p1m1
2p1n1
2p1p1
2p1r1
2p1s1
2p1ş1
2p1t1
2p1v1
2p1y1
2p1z1
2r1b1
2r1c1
2r1ç1
2r1d1
2r1f1
2r1g1
2r1ğ1
2r1h1
2r1j1
2r1k1
2r1l1
2r1m1
2r1n1
2r1p1
2r1r1
2r1s1
2r1ş1
2r1t1
2r1v1
2r1y1
2r1z1
2s1b1
2s1c1
2s1ç1
2s1d1
2s1f1
2s1g1
2s1ğ1
2s1h1
2s1j1
2s1k1
2s1l1
2s1m1
2s1n1
2s1p1
2s1r1
2s1s1
2s1ş1
2s1t1
2s1v1
2s1y1
2s1z1
2ş1b1
2ş1c1
2ş1ç1
2ş1d1
2ş1f1
2ş1g1
2ş1ğ1
2ş1h1
2ş1j1
2ş1k1
2ş1l1
2ş1m1
2ş1n1
2ş1p1
2ş1r1
2ş1s1
2ş1ş1
2ş1t1
2ş1v1
2ş1y1
2ş1z1
2t1b1
2t1c1
2t1ç1
2t1d1
2t1f1
2t1g1
2t1ğ1
2t1h1
2t1j1
2t1k1
2t1l1
2t1m1
2t1n1
2t1p1
2t1r1
2t1s1
2t1ş1
2t1t1
2t1v1
2t1y1
2t1z1
2v1b1
2v1c1
2v1ç1
2v1d1
2v1f1
2v1g1
2v1ğ1
2v1h1
2v1j1
2v1k1
2v1l1
2v1m1
2v1n1
2v1p1
2v1r1
2v1s1
2v1ş1
2v1t1
2v1v1
2v1y1
2v1z1
2y1b1
2y1c1
2y1ç1
2y1d1
2y1f1
2y1g1
2y1ğ1
2y1h1
2y1j1
2y1k1
2y1l1
2y1m1
2y1n1
2y1p1
2y1r1
2y1s1
2y1ş1
2y1t1
2y1v1
2y1y1
2y1z1
2z1b1
2z1c1
2z1ç1
2z1d1
2z1f1
2z1g1
2z1ğ1
2z1h1
2z1j1
2z1k1
2z1l1
2z1m1
2z1n1
2z1p1
2z1r1
2z1s1
2z1ş1
2z1t1
2z1v1
2z1y1
2z1z1
2a3a2
a3â2
a3e2
a3ı2
a3i2
a3î2
a3o2
a3ö2
a3u2
a3ü2
a3û2
â3a2
2â3â2
â3e2
â3ı2
â3i2
â3î2
â3o2
â3ö2
â3u2
â3ü2
â3û2
e3a2
e3â2
2e3e2
e3ı2
e3i2
e3î2
e3o2
e3ö2
e3u2
e3ü2
e3û2
ı3a2
ı3â2
ı3e2
2ı3ı2
ı3i2
ı3î2
ı3o2
ı3ö2
ı3u2
ı3ü2
ı3û2
i3a2
i3â2
i3e2
i3ı2
2i3i2
i3î2
i3o2
i3ö2
i3u2
i3ü2
i3û2
î3a2
î3â2
î3e2
î3ı2
î3i2
2î3î2
î3o2
î3ö2
î3u2
î3ü2
î3û2
o3a2
o3â2
o3e2
o3ı2
o3i2
o3î2
2o3o2
o3ö2
o3u2
o3ü2
o3û2
ö3a2
ö3â2
ö3e2
ö3ı2
ö3i2
ö3î2
ö3o2
2ö3ö2
ö3u2
ö3ü2
ö3û2
u3a2
u3â2
u3e2
u3ı2
u3i2
u3î2
u3o2
u3ö2
2u3u2
u3ü2
u3û2
ü3a2
ü3â2
ü3e2
ü3ı2
ü3i2
ü3î2
ü3o2
ü3ö2
ü3u2
2ü3ü2
ü3û2
û3a2
û3â2
û3e2
û3ı2
û3i2
û3î2
û3o2
û3ö2
û3u2
û3ü2
2û3û2
tu4r4k1
t2u1
tu1r1
m1t4ra1k1
m2t1r1
mtr2a1
